Nevada, session 83, SB461.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 360 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 6, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, “primary job” means a
permanent position of employment at a physical location of a
business in this State, if the employee filling that position works an
average of at least 30 hours per week and:
1. Not less than half of the revenue generated at that location
is derived from exports to locations outside of this State; or
2. The business:
-
*SB461*

– 6 –
(a) Manufactures, produces or sells goods or services that are
imported into this State in significant quantities, as determined by
the Office of Economic Development;
(b) Operates in a sector of the economy that the Office of
Economic Development determines to be critical to the economic
security of this State, including, without limitation, critical
mineral processing, battery production and health care; and
(c) Closes gaps in supply chains, promotes local production or
reduces the outflow of capital from this State.
Sec. 3. 1. A person who intends to locate or expand a high-
impact business in this State may apply to the Office of Economic
Development pursuant to this section for a partial deduction of
one or more of the taxes imposed on the new or expanded business
pursuant to chapter 361, 363B or 374 of NRS.
2. The Office of Economic Development may approve an
application for a partial deduction pursuant to this section if the
Office makes the following determinations:
(a) The business offers primary jobs and is consistent with:
(1) The State Plan for Economic Development developed by
the Executive Director of the Office of Economic Development
pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 231.053; and
(2) Any guidelines adopted by the Executive Director of the
Office to implement the State Plan for Economic Development.
(b) Not later than 1 year after the date on which the
application was received by the Office, the applicant has executed
an agreement with the Office which must:
(1) Comply with the requirements of NRS 360.755;
(2) State the date on which the partial deduction becomes
effective, as agreed to by the applicant and the Office of Economic
Development, which must not be earlier than the date on which
the Office received the application and not later than 1 year after
the date on which the Office approves the application;
(3) State that the business will, after the date on which the
partial deduction becomes effective, continue in operation in this
State for a period specified by the Office of Economic
Development, which must be at least 10 years, and will continue to
meet the eligibility requirements set forth in this subsection;
(4) State that the business will offer primary jobs; and
(5) Bind the successors in interest of the applicant for the
specified period.
(c) The applicant is registered pursuant to the laws of this
State or the applicant commits to obtain a valid business license
and all other permits required by each county, city or town in
which the business operates.
-
*SB461*

– 7 –
(d) The average hourly wage that will be paid by the business
to its new employees in this State during the period of the partial
deduction is not less than 100 percent of the average statewide
hourly wage as established by the Employment Security Division
of the Department of Employment, Training and Rehabilitation on
July 1 of each fiscal year.
(e) The business will, by the eighth calendar quarter following
the calendar quarter in which the partial deduction becomes
effective, offer a health insurance plan for all employees that
includes an option for health insurance coverage for dependents
of the employees, and the health care benefits the business offers
to its employees in this State will meet the minimum requirements
for health care benefits established by the Office of Economic
Development.
(f) If the business is a new business in a county whose
population is less than 100,000 or a city whose population is less
than 60,000, the business will have 5 or more full-time employees
on the payroll of the business by the eighth calendar quarter
following the calendar quarter in which the partial deduction
becomes effective who will be employed at the location of the
business in that county or city until at least the date which is 10
years after the date on which the partial deduction becomes
effective.
(g) If the business is a new business in a county whose
population is 100,000 or more or a city whose population is 60,000
or more, the business will have 25 or more full-time employees on
the payroll of the business by the eighth calendar quarter
following the calendar quarter in which the partial deduction
becomes effective who will be employed at the location of the
business in that county or city until at least the date which is 10
years after the date on which the partial deduction becomes
effective.
3. The total amount of the partial deduction approved by the
Office of Economic Development must be calculated in
accordance with this subsection. The standard amount of the
partial deduction is 10 percent of the total amount of the taxes
owed by the applicant pursuant to chapter 361, 363B or 374 of
NRS, or any combination of those taxes. Additionally, for each of
the following criteria which the Office of Economic Development
determines applies to the applicant, the Office shall approve an
additional partial deduction of 10 percent of the total amount of
the taxes owed by the applicant pursuant to chapter 361, 363B or
374 of NRS, or any combination of those taxes, up to the
maximum amount authorized pursuant to subsections 5 and 6:
-
*SB461*

– 8 –
(a) The average hourly wage that will be paid by the business
to its employees in this State is not less than 150 percent of the
average statewide hourly wage as established by the Employment
Security Division of the Department of Employment, Training and
Rehabilitation on July 1 of each fiscal year.
(b) The business has executed an agreement with an
institution of the Nevada System of Higher Education to:
(1) Sponsor research performed by the institution;
(2) Collaborate with the institution to perform joint
research;
(3) Transfer materials or data to the institution for research
use, at no cost to the institution;
(4) Receive materials or data from the institution for
research use, in exchange for compensation to the institution;
(5) Receive services or products from the institution on an
ongoing basis, in exchange for compensation to the institution;
(6) Loan equipment to the institution for research use, at
no cost to the institution;
(7) Authorize the institution to use facilities of the business
for research purposes, at no cost to the institution;
(8) Use facilities of the institution, in exchange for
compensation to the institution; or
(9) Provide the institution with a license to use software or
another product belonging to the business, at no cost to the
institution.
(c) Not less than 60 percent of the full-time employees hired to
work at the location of the business in this State for the first 5
years after the date on which the partial deduction becomes
effective will be:
(1) Residents of this State; or
(2) Persons who graduated from a high school located in
this State, trade school located in this State, an apprenticeship
program approved by the State Apprenticeship Council created by
NRS 610.030 or college or university located in this State.
(d) The business will participate in a program of workforce
development provided by an authorized provider, as defined in
NRS 231.1415, and, by the eighth calendar quarter following the
calendar quarter in which the partial deduction becomes effective,
not less than 20 percent of the employees of the business who work
at the location of the business in this State will have completed the
program of workforce development.
(e) For the duration of the partial deduction, the business will
offer a health insurance plan for all employees and will cover the
entire amount of the premiums required to be paid for the
-
*SB461*

– 9 –
employee’s coverage under the health insurance plan, without
deduction from the wages of the employee.
(f) For the duration of the partial deduction, the business will
occupy or construct and occupy a newly constructed facility in a
qualified opportunity zone in this State designated by the Secretary
of the Treasury, or his or her designee, pursuant to 26 U.S.C. §
1400Z-1. For the purposes of this paragraph, a facility is newly
constructed if the facility has not been previously occupied by a
person or business.
(g) For the duration of the partial deduction, the business will
offer a housing assistance program to the employees of the
business that provides direct housing assistance that is sufficient,
as determined by the Office of Economic Development, to make
owner-occupied or rental housing attainable to the employees of
the business.
(h) For the duration of the partial deduction, the business will
occupy or construct and occupy a facility that is part of an infill
development project that is consistent with the goals of sustainable
growth and the efficient use of land.
4. Before approving any application for a partial deduction
pursuant to this section, the Office shall conduct an analysis and
certify:
(a) The total amount of taxes that the applicant is anticipated
to incur pursuant to chapters 361, 363B and 374 of NRS, as
applicable, during each of the 10 years following the date on
which the partial deduction becomes effective, absent the effect of
any partial deduction approved pursuant to this section.
(b) The total amount of any partial deduction which the
applicant is anticipated to qualify for as calculated pursuant to
subsection 3.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, the Office of
Economic Development shall not approve a partial deduction
pursuant to this section which would allow for the partial
deduction of more than 60 percent of the total amount of taxes
that the applicant would otherwise owe pursuant to chapter 361,
363B or 374 of NRS during any of the 10 years following the date
on which the partial deduction becomes effective or over the entire
10-year period following the date on which the partial deduction
becomes effective.
6. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an
applicant for a partial deduction pursuant to this section may also
apply for and receive any abatement or partial abatement of taxes
authorized pursuant to chapter 360 of NRS or any other specific
statute for which the applicant otherwise qualifies. Any
combination of the partial deduction approved pursuant to this
-
*SB461*

– 10 –
section and any abatements approved pursuant to chapter 360 of
NRS or any other specific statute must not, in any fiscal year,
allow for the partial deduction and abatement of more than 90
percent of the total amount of taxes that the business would
otherwise owe pursuant to chapter 361, 363B or 374 of NRS.
7. The Office of Economic Development must not:
(a) Consider an application for a partial deduction unless the
Office has requested a letter of acknowledgment of the request for
the partial deduction from any affected county, school district, city
or town and has complied with the requirements of NRS 360.757;
or
(b) Approve a partial deduction for any applicant for a period
of more than 10 years.
8. If the Office of Economic Development approves an
application for a partial deduction pursuant to this section, the
Office shall immediately forward a certificate of eligibility for the
partial deduction to:
(a) The Department;
(b) The Nevada Tax Commission; and
(c) If the partial deduction is from personal property taxes, the
appropriate county treasurer.
9. An applicant for a partial deduction pursuant to this
section or an existing business whose partial deduction is in effect
shall, upon the request of the Executive Director of the Office of
Economic Development, furnish the Executive Director with
copies of all records necessary to verify that the applicant meets
the requirements of subsection 2 and any applicable criteria
described in subsection 3.
10. If an applicant for a partial deduction pursuant to this
section fails to execute the agreement described in paragraph (b)
of subsection 2 within 1 year after the date on which the
application was received by the Office of Economic Development,
the applicant shall not be approved for a partial deduction
pursuant to this section unless the applicant submits a new
application.
11. If a business whose partial deduction has been approved
pursuant to this section and whose partial deduction is in effect
ceases:
(a) To meet the requirements set forth in subsection 2;
(b) To meet any criteria set forth in subsection 3 for which the
business was receiving a partial deduction; or
(c) Operation before the time specified in the agreement
described in paragraph (b) of subsection 2,
 the business shall repay to the Department or, if the partial
deduction was from personal property taxes, to the appropriate
-
*SB461*

– 11 –
county treasurer, the amount of the partial deduction that was
allowed pursuant to this section before the failure of the business
to comply, unless the Nevada Tax Commission determines that the
business has substantially complied with the requirements of this
section. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 360.232 and
360.320, the business shall, in addition to the amount of the
partial deduction required to be repaid pursuant to this subsection,
pay interest on the amount due at the rate most recently
established pursuant to NRS 99.040 for each month, or portion
thereof, from the last day of the month following the period for
which the payment would have been made had the partial
deduction not been approved until the date of payment of the tax.
12. The Office of Economic Development may adopt such
regulations as the Office determines to be necessary to carry out
the provisions of this section.
13. An applicant for a partial deduction who is aggrieved by a
final decision of the Office of Economic Development may petition
a court of competent jurisdiction to review the decision in the
manner provided in chapter 233B of NRS.
14. For an employee to be considered a resident of Nevada
for the purposes of this section, the business must maintain in the
personnel file of the employee documentation that the employee is
a current Nevada resident, which must take the form of:
(a) A copy of the current and valid Nevada driver’s license of
the employee or a current and valid identification card for the
employee issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles; or
(b) If the employee is a registered owner of one or more
vehicles in Nevada, a copy of the current motor vehicle
registration of at least one of those vehicles.
15. As used in this section:
(a) “Full-time employee” means a person who is in a
permanent position of employment and works an average of 30
hours per week during the applicable period set forth in
subparagraph (3) of paragraph (b) of subsection 2.
(b) “High-impact business” means a business that is primarily
engaged in:
(1) Electric battery production, including, without
limitation, the refinement or processing of critical minerals for
electric batteries or the manufacturing or assembly of electric
batteries and their components;
(2) The production of clean energy and water technology,
including, without limitation, water resource management
technologies or solar panels, wind turbines or other products for
the generation of renewable energy;
-
*SB461*

– 12 –
(3) Advanced manufacturing, including, without limitation,
the manufacturing of components or equipment for automation,
robotics or additive manufacturing;
(4) The manufacturing of aerospace systems, defense
technologies or national security solutions; or
(5) The manufacturing of biotechnology, pharmaceuticals,
medical devices or equipment for specialty hospitals or diagnostic
laboratories.
Sec. 4. 1. Any person who claims an abatement, partial
abatement or partial deduction of taxes pursuant to NRS 274.310,
274.320, 274.330, 360.750, 360.753, 360.754, 360.890 or 360.950
or section 3 of this act, shall submit to the Department a report, in
such form as the Department may prescribe, not later than 30 days
after the end of any calendar quarter in which the person claimed
the abatement, partial abatement or partial deduction of taxes.
The report must include, without limitation:
(a) A certification by the person claiming the abatement,
partial abatement or partial deduction that the person was
approved to claim the abatement, partial abatement or partial
deduction and has complied with all of the requirements for
claiming the abatement, partial abatement or partial deduction
during the calendar quarter covered by the report.
(b) Documentation showing that the person has complied with
all of the requirements for claiming the abatement, partial
abatement or partial deduction during the calendar quarter
covered by the report.
2. If the person claimed an abatement, partial abatement or
partial deduction of sales and use taxes during the immediately
preceding calendar quarter by presenting to any retailer a
document issued pursuant to NRS 360.7575, the report required
pursuant to this section:
(a) Shall serve as the return for any sales and use tax owed by
the person during the calendar quarter.
(b) Must be accompanied by the amount of any sales and use
tax which is not abated and which is owed by the person for any
transaction occurring during the calendar quarter for which the
sales and use tax was not already remitted.
3. A report submitted pursuant to this section may be used by
the Department for the purposes of auditing the compliance of a
business with the requirements for an abatement, partial
abatement or partial deduction pursuant to NRS 360.755.
Sec. 5. 1. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, if
the Board of Economic Development determines, with respect to
an application for an abatement, partial abatement or partial
deduction of taxes or for transferable tax credits which is reviewed
-
*SB461*

– 13 –
by the Board, that granting the full amount of the abatement,
partial abatement, partial deduction or transferable tax credits
requested or to which the applicant would otherwise be entitled is
not in the best interests of the State, the Board may:
(a) Deny the application; or
(b) Approve the application but for a lower amount, or
otherwise place conditions on the approval of the abatement,
partial abatement, partial deduction or transferable tax credits.
2. In determining whether granting the full amount of an
abatement, partial abatement, partial deduction or transferable tax
credits is in the best interests of the State for the purposes of
subsection 1, the Board may consider the following factors, with
respect to the business that is the subject of the application:
(a) The projected water consumption of the business,
particularly if the business is or will be located in a region with
limited water resources, with the goal of promoting the sustainable
use of the water supplies in this State.
(b) The alignment of the business with the social objectives of
the State, including, without limitation, the promotion of equity,
education and community well-being.
(c) The potential environmental impact of the business,
including, without limitation, the likelihood of a significant
adverse effect on air quality, water quality or local ecosystems.
(d) The alignment of the business with the economic objectives
of the State, including, without limitation, the creation of jobs, the
diversification of the economy of the State and the long-term
economic development of the State.
(e) The anticipated impact of the business on local
communities, including, without limitation, the impact on traffic,
infrastructure and community resources.
(f) The financial stability and viability of the business,
including, without limitation, signs of financial instability that
may pose a risk to state investments.
3. The Board of Economic Development may consider the
factors listed in subsection 2 with respect to any other decision
which the Board is authorized to make with respect to an
application for an abatement, partial abatement, partial deduction
or transferable tax credits, including, without limitation, the
duration of the abatement, partial abatement, partial deduction or
transferable tax credits.
Sec. 6. 1. A person who has undertaken a project for the
location or expansion of a child care facility in this State may
apply to the Office of Economic Development for a certificate of
eligibility for transferable tax credits for qualified expenditures.
The transferable tax credits may be applied to:
-
*SB461*

– 14 –
(a) Any tax imposed by chapters 363A and 363B of NRS;
(b) The gaming license fees imposed by the provisions of
NRS 463.370;
(c) Any tax imposed by chapter 680B of NRS; or
(d) Any combination of the fees and taxes described in
paragraphs (a), (b) and (c).
2. The Office of Economic Development shall not approve
any application for transferable tax credits pursuant to this section
if approval of the application would cause the total amount of
transferable tax credits approved pursuant to this section for each
fiscal year to exceed the sum of $12,000,000. For each biennium
beginning on July 1 of an odd-numbered year, if, in the first fiscal
year of the biennium, the Office does not approve an amount of
transferable tax credits equal to the amount authorized by this
subsection for that fiscal year, the remaining amount of
transferable tax credits must be carried forward to the next fiscal
year of the biennium and made available for approval only during
that fiscal year. The Office shall not approve any transferable tax
credits pursuant to this section for a fiscal year beginning on or
after July 1, 2045. Any transferable tax credits issued pursuant to
this section may not be claimed before July 1, 2026.
3. The Office of Economic Development may approve an
application for a certificate of eligibility for transferable tax
credits if the Office finds that the applicant qualifies for the
transferable tax credits pursuant to this section and the Office
deems that the issuance of the tax credits will support the
economic development of the State, after considering:
(a) The extent to which the child care facility will address an
identified shortage in child care services in areas of critical
workforce demand;
(b) The feasibility and sustainability of the facility; and
(c) The potential economic and social benefits of the child care
facility to the local community.
4. To be eligible for transferable tax credits pursuant to this
section, an applicant must:
(a) Submit an application in such form as the Office of
Economic Development prescribes;
(b) Provide proof satisfactory to the Office that the child care
facility will promote the economic development of the State;
(c) Provide a detailed description of the child care facility that
includes, without limitation, the location of the facility and the
services that will be provided by the child care facility;
(d) Demonstrate that the child care facility will operate in an
area of critical workforce demand or where there is a scarcity of
child care facilities, as determined by the Office;
-
*SB461*

– 15 –
(e) If the child care facility is sponsored by an employer,
ensure that each employee who makes use of the child care facility
is charged for the services of the facility in an amount that is not
more than 15 percent of the salary of the employee per child
enrolled in the facility;
(f) Not later than 270 days after the date of the substantial
completion of the project for the location or expansion of a child
care facility in this State, unless the Office agrees to extend this
period by not more than 90 days, provide the Office with an audit
of the qualified expenditures made for the location or expansion
of the child care facility that includes an itemized report of such
expenditures and is certified by an independent certified public
account in this State who is approved by the Office;
(g) Pay the cost of the audit required by paragraph (f); and
(h) Meet any other requirements prescribed by the Office.
5. If the Office of Economic Development approves an
application for a certificate of eligibility for transferable tax
credits pursuant to this section, the Office shall immediately
forward a copy of the certificate of eligibility which identifies the
estimated amount of the tax credits available to:
(a) The applicant;
(b) The Department; and
(c) The Nevada Gaming Control Board.
6. Within 30 days after the receipt of an audit provided by an
applicant pursuant to paragraph (f) of subsection 4 and any other
accountings or other information required by the Office of
Economic Development, the Office shall determine whether to
certify the audit and make a final determination of whether a
certificate of transferable tax credits will be issued. If the Office
certifies the audit, determines that all other requirements for the
transferable tax credits have been met and determines that a
certificate of transferable tax credits will be issued, the Office
shall notify the applicant that the transferable tax credits will be
issued. Within 30 days after the receipt of the notice, the applicant
shall make an irrevocable declaration of the amount of
transferable tax credits that will be applied to each fee or tax set
forth in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of subsection 1, thereby
accounting for all the credits which will be issued. Upon receipt of
the declaration, the Office:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 10, shall certify
to the Department or the Nevada Gaming Control Board, as
applicable, that the amount of transferable tax credits approved
pursuant to this section will be deducted from the amount of
transferable tax credits that the Office is authorized to approve
pursuant to NRS 360.892 for that fiscal year or pursuant to
-
*SB461*

– 16 –
NRS 231.1555 for that fiscal year, or any combination of those
transferable tax credits.
(b) After complying with the provisions of paragraph (a), shall
issue to the applicant a certificate of transferable tax credits in the
amount approved by the Office for the fees or taxes included in the
declaration.
7. A person who is issued transferable tax credits pursuant to
this section shall notify the Office of Economic Development upon
transferring any of the transferable tax credits. The Office shall
notify the Department and the Nevada Gaming Control Board of
all transferable tax credits issued, segregated by each fee or tax set
forth in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of subsection 1, and the
amount of any transferable tax credits transferred.
8. A person who is issued transferable tax credits pursuant to
this section and every person to whom transferable tax credits are
transferred by such a person may not, collectively, use more than
one-fifth of the total amount of transferable tax credits issued
pursuant to this section during a fiscal year. If a person who is
issued transferable tax credits pursuant to this section transfers
those credits, the transfer must be made pursuant to an agreement
which includes provisions that are calculated to prevent any
violation of this subsection, including, without limitation, a
provision which notifies the person to whom the credits will be
transferred of the requirements of this subsection.
9. The transferable tax credits issued pursuant to this section
expire 5 years after the date on which the transferable tax credits
are issued to the applicant.
10. In each fiscal year, the Office must not, pursuant to
paragraph (a) of subsection 6, reduce the amount of transferable
tax credits authorized pursuant to:
(a) NRS 231.1555 by more than $5,000,000.
(b) NRS 360.892 by more than $7,000,000.
11. The amount of the transferable tax credits issued to an
applicant pursuant to this section must be a percentage of the
amount of qualified expenditures by the applicant as supported by
the audit submitted pursuant to paragraph (f) of subsection 4 and
must not exceed 60 percent of the amount of such qualified
expenditures.
12. An applicant for transferable tax credits pursuant to this
section shall, upon the request of the Executive Director of the
Office of Economic Development, furnish the Executive Director
with copies of all records necessary to verify that the applicant
meets the requirements of this section.
13. The Office shall, on or before August 1 of each year,
submit to the Governor and the Director of the Legislative Counsel
-
*SB461*

– 17 –
Bureau for transmittal to the Legislature and the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Revenue a report which includes, without
limitation:
(a) The number of child care facilities established or expanded
which received transferable tax credits pursuant to this section,
both in the immediately preceding fiscal year and in total;
(b) The total number of transferable tax credits issued in the
immediately preceding year; and
(c) The geographic distribution by county and city of the child
care facilities which received transferable tax credits pursuant to
this section, both in the immediately preceding year and over the
lifetime of the program.
14. The Office of Economic Development may adopt any
regulations that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this
section.
15. The Nevada Tax Commission and the Nevada Gaming
Commission:
(a) Shall adopt regulations prescribing the manner in which
transferable tax credits will be administered.
(b) May adopt any other regulations that are necessary to
carry out the provisions of this section.
16. For the purposes of this section, the date of the
substantial completion of a project for the location or expansion of
a child care facility shall be deemed to be the date on which:
(a) The final building inspection of the facility is concluded;
(b) A notice of completion is issued for the facility; or
(c) A certificate of occupancy is issued for the facility,
 whichever occurs later.
17. As used in this section, “qualified expenditure” means
expenditures directly related to the establishment, construction,
expansion or improvement of a licensed child care facility,
including, without limitation, land acquisition, construction,
renovations, equipment purchases and operational start-up costs.
Sec. 7. NRS 360.225 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.225 1. During the course of an investigation undertaken
pursuant to NRS 360.130 of a person claiming:
(a) A partial abatement of property taxes pursuant to
NRS 361.0687;
(b) An exemption from taxes pursuant to NRS 363B.120;
(c) A deferral of the payment of taxes on the sale of eligible
property pursuant to NRS 372.397 or 374.402;
(d) An abatement of taxes on the gross receipts from the sale,
storage, use or other consumption of eligible machinery or
equipment pursuant to NRS 374.357;
-
*SB461*

– 18 –
(e) A partial abatement of taxes pursuant to NRS 360.754 on or
before December 31, 2056;
(f) A partial abatement of taxes pursuant to NRS 360.890 on or
before June 30, [2032;] 2033; or
(g) A partial deduction of taxes pursuant to section 3 of this
act on or before June 30, 2045; or
(h) An abatement of taxes pursuant to NRS 360.950 on or
before June 30, 2036,
 the Department shall investigate whether the person meets the
eligibility requirements for the abatement, partial abatement, partial
deduction, exemption or deferral that the person is claiming.
2. If the Department finds that the person does not meet the
eligibility requirements for the abatement, deduction, exemption or
deferral which the person is claiming, the Department shall report its
findings to the Office of Economic Development and take any other
necessary actions.
Sec. 8. NRS 360.750 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.750 1. A person who intends to locate or expand a
business in this State may apply to the Office of Economic
Development pursuant to this section for a partial abatement of one
or more of the taxes imposed on the:
(a) New business pursuant to chapter 361, 363B or 374 of NRS.
(b) Expanded business pursuant to chapter 361 or 363B of NRS
or a partial abatement of the local sales and use taxes imposed on
the expanded business. As used in this paragraph, “local sales and
use taxes” means the taxes imposed on the gross receipts of any
retailer from the sale of tangible personal property sold at retail, or
stored, used or otherwise consumed, in the political subdivision in
which the business is to be located or expanded, except the taxes
imposed by the Sales and Use Tax Act and the Local School
Support Tax Law.
2. The Office of Economic Development shall approve an
application for a partial abatement pursuant to this section if the
Office makes the following determinations:
(a) The business offers primary jobs and is consistent with:
(1) The State Plan for Economic Development developed by
the Executive Director of the Office of Economic Development
pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 231.053; and
(2) Any guidelines adopted by the Executive Director of the
Office to implement the State Plan for Economic Development.
(b) Not later than 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office, the applicant has executed an agreement
with the Office which must:
(1) Comply with the requirements of NRS 360.755;
-
*SB461*

– 19 –
(2) State the date on which the abatement becomes effective,
as agreed to by the applicant and the Office, which must not be
earlier than the date on which the Office received the application
and not later than 1 year after the date on which the Office approves
the application;
(3) State that the business will, after the date on which the
abatement becomes effective, continue in operation in this State for
a period specified by the Office, which must be at least 5 years, and
will continue to meet the eligibility requirements set forth in this
subsection;
(4) State that the business will offer primary jobs; and
(5) Bind the successors in interest of the business for the
specified period.
(c) The business is registered pursuant to the laws of this State
or the applicant commits to obtain a valid business license and all
other permits required by the county, city or town in which the
business operates.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, 5 or 6, the
average hourly wage that will be paid by the business to its new
employees in this State is at least 100 percent of the average
statewide hourly wage as established by the Employment Security
Division of the Department of Employment, Training and
Rehabilitation on July 1 of each fiscal year.
(e) The business will, by the eighth calendar quarter following
the calendar quarter in which the abatement becomes effective, offer
a health insurance plan for all employees that includes an option for
health insurance coverage for dependents of the employees, and the
health care benefits the business offers to its employees in this State
will meet the minimum requirements for health care benefits
established by the Office.
(f) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and NRS
361.0687, if the business is a new business in a county whose
population is 100,000 or more or a city whose population is 60,000
or more, the business meets at least one of the following
requirements:
(1) The business will have 50 or more full-time employees
on the payroll of the business by the eighth calendar quarter
following the calendar quarter in which the abatement becomes
effective who will be employed at the location of the business in
that county or city until at least the date which is 5 years after the
date on which the abatement becomes effective.
(2) Establishing the business will require the business to
make, not later than the date which is 2 years after the date on which
the abatement becomes effective, a capital investment of at least
$1,000,000 in this State in capital assets that will be retained at the
-
*SB461*

– 20 –
location of the business in that county or city until at least the date
which is 5 years after the date on which the abatement becomes
effective.
(g) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 361.0687, if the
business is a new business in a county whose population is less than
100,000, in an area of a county whose population is 100,000 or more
that is located within the geographic boundaries of an area that is
designated as rural by the United States Department of Agriculture
and at least 20 miles outside of the geographic boundaries of an area
designated as urban by the United States Department of Agriculture,
or in a city whose population is less than 60,000, the business meets
at least one of the following requirements:
(1) The business will have 10 or more full-time employees
on the payroll of the business by the eighth calendar quarter
following the calendar quarter in which the abatement becomes
effective who will be employed at the location of the business in
that county or city until at least the date which is 5 years after the
date on which the abatement becomes effective.
(2) Establishing the business will require the business to
make, not later than the date which is 2 years after the date on which
the abatement becomes effective, a capital investment of at least
$250,000 in this State in capital assets that will be retained at the
location of the business in that county or city until at least the date
which is 5 years after the date on which the abatement becomes
effective.
(h) If the business is an existing business, the business meets at
least one of the following requirements:
(1) For a business in:
(I) Except as otherwise provided in sub-subparagraph (II),
a county whose population is 100,000 or more or a city whose
population is 60,000 or more, the business will, by the eighth
calendar quarter following the calendar quarter in which the
abatement becomes effective, increase the number of employees on
its payroll in that county or city by 10 percent more than it
employed in the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year in
which the abatement becomes effective or by twenty-five
employees, whichever is greater, who will be employed at the
location of the business in that county or city until at least the date
which is 5 years after the date on which the abatement becomes
effective; or
(II) A county whose population is less than 100,000, an
area of a county whose population is 100,000 or more that is located
within the geographic boundaries of an area that is designated as
rural by the United States Department of Agriculture and at least 20
miles outside of the geographic boundaries of an area designated as
-
*SB461*

– 21 –
urban by the United States Department of Agriculture, or a city
whose population is less than 60,000, the business will, by the
eighth calendar quarter following the calendar quarter in which the
abatement becomes effective, increase the number of employees on
its payroll in that county or city by 10 percent more than it
employed in the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year in
which the abatement becomes effective or by six employees,
whichever is greater, who will be employed at the location of the
business in that county or city until at least the date which is 5 years
after the date on which the abatement becomes effective.
(2) The business will expand by making a capital investment
in this State, not later than the date which is 2 years after the date on
which the abatement becomes effective, in an amount equal to at
least 20 percent of the value of the tangible property possessed by
the business in the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year
in which the abatement becomes effective, and the capital
investment will be in capital assets that will be retained at the
location of the business in that county or city until at least the date
which is 5 years after the date on which the abatement becomes
effective. The determination of the value of the tangible property
possessed by the business in the immediately preceding fiscal year
must be made by the:
(I) County assessor of the county in which the business
will expand, if the business is locally assessed; or
(II) Department, if the business is centrally assessed.
(i) The applicant has provided in the application an estimate of
the total number of new employees which the business anticipates
hiring in this State by the eighth calendar quarter following the
calendar quarter in which the abatement becomes effective if the
Office approves the application.
(j) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, if the business
will have at least 50 full-time employees on the payroll of the
business by the eighth calendar quarter following the calendar
quarter in which the abatement becomes effective, the business, by
the earlier of the eighth calendar quarter following the calendar
quarter in which the abatement becomes effective or the date on
which the business has at least 50 full-time employees on the payroll
of the business, has a policy for paid family and medical leave and
agrees that all employees who have been employed by the business
for at least 1 year will be eligible for at least 12 weeks of paid
family and medical leave at a rate of at least 55 percent of the
regular wage of the employee. The business will agree in writing
that if the Office approves the application, the business will not:
(1) Prohibit, interfere with or otherwise discourage an
employee from taking paid family and medical leave:
-
*SB461*

– 22 –
(I) For any reason authorized pursuant to the Family and
Medical Leave Act of 1993, 29 U.S.C. §§ 2601 et seq.
(II) To care for any adult child, sibling or domestic
partner of the employee.
(2) Discriminate, discipline or discharge an employee for
taking paid family and medical leave:
(I) For any reason authorized pursuant to the Family and
Medical Leave Act of 1993, 29 U.S.C. §§ 2601 et seq.
(II) To care for any adult child, sibling or domestic
partner of the employee.
(3) Prohibit, interfere with or otherwise discourage an
employee or other person from bringing a proceeding or testifying
in a proceeding against the business for a violation of the policy for
paid family and medical leave that is required pursuant to this
paragraph.
3. For purposes of paragraph (j) of subsection 2, the Office of
Economic Development shall determine that a business meets the
requirements of that paragraph if the business has a policy for paid
family and medical leave for employees on the payroll of the
business outside of this State that meets or exceeds the requirements
for a policy for paid family and medical leave pursuant to that
paragraph and the business agrees in writing that its employees on
the payroll in this State are eligible for paid family and medical
leave under such policy.
4. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 2, the Office
of Economic Development:
(a) Shall not consider an application for a partial abatement
pursuant to this section unless the Office has requested a letter of
acknowledgment of the request for the abatement from any affected
county, school district, city or town.
(b) Shall consider the level of health care benefits provided by
the business to its employees, the policy of paid family and medical
leave provided by the business to its employees, the projected
economic impact of the business and the projected tax revenue of
the business after deducting projected revenue from the abated
taxes.
(c) May, if the Office determines that such action is necessary:
(1) Approve an application for a partial abatement pursuant
to this section by a business that does not meet the requirements set
forth in paragraph (f), (g) or (h) of subsection 2;
(2) Make any of the requirements set forth in paragraphs (d)
to (h), inclusive, of subsection 2 more stringent; or
(3) Add additional requirements that a business must meet to
qualify for a partial abatement pursuant to this section.
-
*SB461*

– 23 –
5. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Office of
Economic Development shall not approve an application for a
partial abatement pursuant to this section if:
(a) The applicant intends to locate or expand in a county in
which the rate of unemployment is 7 percent or more and the
average hourly wage that will be paid by the applicant to its new
employees in this State is less than 70 percent of the average
statewide hourly wage, as established by the Employment Security
Division of the Department of Employment, Training and
Rehabilitation on July 1 of each fiscal year.
(b) The applicant intends to locate or expand in a county in
which the rate of unemployment is less than 7 percent and the
average hourly wage that will be paid by the applicant to its new
employees in this State is less than 85 percent of the average
statewide hourly wage, as established by the Employment Security
Division of the Department of Employment, Training and
Rehabilitation on July 1 of each fiscal year.
[(c) The applicant intends to locate in a county but has already
received a partial abatement pursuant to this section for locating that
business in that county.
(d) The applicant intends to expand in a county but has already
received a partial abatement pursuant to this section for expanding
that business in that county.
(e) The applicant has changed the name or identity of the
business to evade the provisions of paragraph (c) or (d).]
6. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the Office of
Economic Development approves an application for a partial
abatement pursuant to this section, in determining the types of taxes
imposed on a new or expanded business for which the partial
abatement will be approved and the amount of the partial abatement:
(a) If the new or expanded business is located in a county in
which the rate of unemployment is 7 percent or more and the
average hourly wage that will be paid by the business to its new
employees in this State is less than 85 percent of the average
statewide hourly wage, as established by the Employment Security
Division of the Department of Employment, Training and
Rehabilitation on July 1 of each fiscal year, the Office shall not:
(1) Approve an abatement of the taxes imposed pursuant to
chapter 361 of NRS which exceeds 25 percent of the taxes on
personal property payable by the business each year.
(2) Approve an abatement of the taxes imposed pursuant to
chapter 363B of NRS which exceeds 25 percent of the amount of
tax otherwise due pursuant to NRS 363B.110.
(b) If the new or expanded business is located in a county in
which the rate of unemployment is less than 7 percent and the
-
*SB461*

– 24 –
average hourly wage that will be paid by the business to its new
employees in this State is less than 100 percent of the average
statewide hourly wage, as established by the Employment Security
Division of the Department of Employment, Training and
Rehabilitation on July 1 of each fiscal year, the Office shall not:
(1) Approve an abatement of the taxes imposed pursuant to
chapter 361 of NRS which exceeds 25 percent of the taxes on
personal property payable by the business each year.
(2) Approve an abatement of the taxes imposed pursuant to
chapter 363B of NRS which exceeds 25 percent of the amount of
tax otherwise due pursuant to NRS 363B.110.
7. If the Office of Economic Development approves an
application for a partial abatement pursuant to this section, the
Office shall immediately forward a certificate of eligibility for the
abatement to:
(a) The Department;
(b) The Nevada Tax Commission; and
(c) If the partial abatement is from the property tax imposed
pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS, the county treasurer.
8. An applicant for a partial abatement pursuant to this section
or an existing business whose partial abatement is in effect shall,
upon the request of the Executive Director of the Office of
Economic Development, furnish the Executive Director with copies
of all records necessary to verify that the applicant meets the
requirements of subsection 2.
9. If an applicant for a partial abatement pursuant to this
section fails to execute the agreement described in paragraph (b) of
subsection 2 within 1 year after the date on which the application
was received by the Office, the applicant shall not be approved for a
partial abatement pursuant to this section unless the applicant
submits a new application.
10. If a business whose partial abatement has been approved
pursuant to this section and is in effect ceases:
(a) To meet the requirements set forth in subsection 2; or
(b) Operation before the time specified in the agreement
described in paragraph (b) of subsection 2,
 the business shall repay to the Department or, if the partial
abatement was from the property tax imposed pursuant to chapter
361 of NRS, to the county treasurer, the amount of the partial
abatement that was allowed pursuant to this section before the
failure of the business to comply unless the Nevada Tax
Commission determines that the business has substantially complied
with the requirements of this section. Except as otherwise provided
in NRS 360.232 and 360.320, the business shall, in addition to the
amount of the partial abatement required to be paid pursuant to this
-
*SB461*

– 25 –
subsection, pay interest on the amount due at the rate most recently
established pursuant to NRS 99.040 for each month, or portion
thereof, from the last day of the month following the period for
which the payment would have been made had the partial abatement
not been approved until the date of payment of the tax.
11. A county treasurer:
(a) Shall deposit any money that he or she receives pursuant to
subsection 10 in one or more of the funds established by a local
government of the county pursuant to NRS 354.6113 or 354.6115;
and
(b) May use the money deposited pursuant to paragraph (a) only
for the purposes authorized by NRS 354.6113 and 354.6115.
12. The Office of Economic Development may adopt such
regulations as the Office of Economic Development determines to
be necessary to carry out the provisions of this section and
NRS 360.755.
13. The Nevada Tax Commission:
(a) Shall adopt regulations regarding:
(1) The capital investment that a new business must make to
meet the requirement set forth in paragraph (f) or (g) of subsection
2; and
(2) Any security that a business is required to post to qualify
for a partial abatement pursuant to this section.
(b) May adopt such other regulations as the Nevada Tax
Commission determines to be necessary to carry out the provisions
of this section and NRS 360.755.
14. An applicant for a partial abatement pursuant to this section
who is aggrieved by a final decision of the Office of Economic
Development may petition for judicial review in the manner
provided in chapter 233B of NRS.
15. For the purposes of this section, an employee is a “full-time
employee” if he or she is in a permanent position of employment
and works an average of 30 hours per week during the applicable
period set forth in subsection 2.
Sec. 9. NRS 360.755 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.755 1. If the Office of Economic Development approves
an application by a business for an abatement of taxes pursuant to
NRS 360.950 , [or] a partial abatement pursuant to NRS 360.750,
360.753, 360.754 or 360.890 [,] or a partial deduction pursuant to
section 3 of this act, the agreement with the Office must provide
that the business:
(a) Agrees to allow the Department to conduct audits of the
business to determine whether the business is in full compliance
with the requirements for the abatement , [or] partial abatement [;]
or partial deduction; and
-
*SB461*

– 26 –
(b) Consents to the disclosure of the audit reports in the manner
set forth in this section.
2. If the Department conducts an audit of the business to
determine whether the business is in full compliance with the
requirements for the abatement , [or] partial abatement [,] or partial
deduction, the Department shall, upon request, provide the audit
report to the Office of Economic Development.
3. Until the business has exhausted all appeals to the
Department and the Nevada Tax Commission relating to the audit,
the information contained in the audit report provided to the Office
of Economic Development:
(a) Is confidential proprietary information of the business;
(b) Is not a public record; and
(c) Must not be disclosed to any person who is not an officer or
employee of the Office of Economic Development unless the
business consents to the disclosure.
4. After the business has exhausted all appeals to the
Department and the Nevada Tax Commission relating to the audit:
(a) The audit report provided to the Office of Economic
Development is a public record; and
(b) Upon request by any person, the Executive Director of the
Office of Economic Development shall disclose the audit report to
the person who made the request, except for any information in the
audit report that is protected from disclosure pursuant to
subsection 5.
5. Before the Executive Director of the Office of Economic
Development discloses the audit report to the public, the business
may submit a request to the Executive Director to protect from
disclosure any information in the audit report which, under
generally accepted business practices, would be considered a trade
secret or other confidential proprietary information of the business.
After consulting with the business, the Executive Director shall
determine whether to protect the information from disclosure. The
decision of the Executive Director is final and is not subject to
judicial review. If the Executive Director determines to protect the
information from disclosure, the protected information:
(a) Is confidential proprietary information of the business;
(b) Is not a public record;
(c) Must be redacted by the Executive Director from any audit
report that is disclosed to the public; and
(d) Must not be disclosed to any person who is not an officer or
employee of the Office of Economic Development unless the
business consents to the disclosure.
-
*SB461*

– 27 –
Sec. 10. NRS 360.757 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.757 1. The Office of Economic Development shall not
take any action on an application for any abatement of taxes
pursuant to NRS 274.310, 274.320, 274.330, 360.750, 360.753 or
360.754 or any other specific statute or a partial deduction of taxes
pursuant to section 3 of this act unless the Office:
(a) Takes that action at a public meeting conducted for that
purpose; and
(b) At least 30 days before the meeting, provides notice of the
application to:
(1) The governing body of the county, the board of trustees
of the school district and the governing body of the city or town, if
any, in which the pertinent business is or will be located;
(2) The governing body of any other political subdivision
that could be affected by the abatement [;] or deduction; and
(3) The general public.
2. The notice required by this section must set forth the date,
time and location of the meeting at which the Office of Economic
Development will consider the application.
3. The Office of Economic Development shall adopt
regulations relating to the notice required by this section.
Sec. 11. NRS 360.7575 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.7575 1. If the Office of Economic Development
approves an application for an abatement of sales and use taxes
pursuant to NRS 360.950 or a partial abatement of any sales and use
taxes pursuant to NRS 274.310, 274.320, 274.330, 360.750,
360.753, 360.754 or 360.890, the Department shall issue to the
business a document certifying the abatement or partial abatement
which can be presented to retailers at the time of purchase. The
document must clearly state that the business is not required to pay
sales and use taxes or the rate of sales and use tax that the business
is required to pay. If the business presents to a retailer the
document issued to the business pursuant to this subsection and
does not pay sales or use tax which is not abated or deducted, the
business must comply with the provisions of subsection 2 of
section 4 of this act.
2. If the Department has issued to a business a document
pursuant to subsection 1 and the business pays an amount of sales
and use taxes for which the business was entitled to an abatement or
deduction because the business fails to present the document, the
business may apply to the Department for a refund of the amount of
sales and use tax paid for which the business was entitled to an
abatement [.] or deduction. If the Department has issued to a
business a document pursuant to subsection 1 and the failure of the
business to present the document results in the business paying the
-
*SB461*

– 28 –
full amount of sales and use tax on 50 percent or more of the
purchases for which the business was eligible for the abatement [,]
or deduction, the Department shall impose on the business a penalty
equal to 10 percent of the total amount of the abatement [.] or
deduction. The Department shall distribute the proceeds of any
penalty imposed pursuant to this subsection to each local
government affected by a refund issued pursuant to this subsection
in proportion to the amount of the refunds for which the affected
local government is responsible.
3. If, after submitting an application for an abatement of sales
and use taxes pursuant to NRS 360.950 , [or] a partial abatement of
any sales and use taxes pursuant to NRS 360.750, 360.753, 360.754
or 360.890 or a partial deduction pursuant to section 3 of this act
and before receiving the document issued pursuant to subsection 1, a
business pays an amount of sales and use tax for which the business
is entitled to an abatement [,] or deduction, the business may apply
to the Department for a refund of the amount of sales and use tax
which the applicant paid for which the business is entitled to an
abatement [.] or deduction.
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no interest is
allowed on a refund made pursuant to subsection 2 or 3.
Sec. 12. NRS 360.892 is hereby amended to read as follows:
360.892 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
Office of Economic Development shall not approve transferable tax
credits:
(a) For Fiscal Year 2017-2018, 2018-2019, 2019-2020, 2020-
2021, 2021-2022, 2022-2023, 2023-2024 , [or] 2024-2025 [,] or any
subsequent fiscal year, if approval of the transferable tax credits
would cause the total amount of transferable tax credits issued
pursuant to NRS 360.880 to 360.896, inclusive, in that Fiscal Year
to exceed $7,600,000.
(b) For a fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, [2025.] 2033.
2. The total amount of transferable tax credits issued pursuant
to NRS 360.880 to 360.896, inclusive, to all qualified projects in
this State must not exceed $38,000,000.
3. If in any fiscal year the Office does not approve an amount
of transferable tax credits equal to the total amount authorized by
[paragraph (a) or (b) of] subsection 1, the remaining amount of
transferable tax credits must be carried forward and made available
for approval during subsequent fiscal years ending on or before
June 30, [2025.] 2033.
4. Each transferable tax credit issued pursuant to NRS 360.880
to 360.896, inclusive, expires 4 years after the date on which the
transferable tax credit is issued to the lead participant. A transferable
-
*SB461*

– 29 –
tax credit issued pursuant to NRS 360.880 to 360.896, inclusive,
may be transferred only once.
Sec. 13. Chapter 361 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A person who intends to locate or expand a high-impact
business in this State may, pursuant to section 3 of this act, apply
to the Office of Economic Development for a partial deduction
from the taxes imposed by this chapter on the personal property of
the high-impact business.
2. For a business to qualify pursuant to section 3 of this act
for a partial deduction from the taxes imposed by this chapter on
the personal property of the business, the Office of Economic
Development must determine that, in addition to meeting the other
requirements set forth in subsection 2 of section 3 of this act:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), if the
business is a new business in a county whose population is
100,000 or more, or a city whose population is 60,000 or more, the
business will, not later than the date which is 2 years after the date
on which the deduction becomes effective, make a capital
investment in the county or city of:
(1) At least $5,000,000 if the business is an industrial or
manufacturing business; or
(2) At least $1,000,000 if the business is not an industrial or
manufacturing business,
 in capital assets that will be retained at the location of the
business in that county or city until at least the date which is 5
years after the date on which the deduction becomes effective.
(b) If the business is a new business in a county whose
population is less than 100,000, in an area of a county whose
population is 100,000 or more that is located within the
geographic boundaries of an area that is designated as rural by
the United States Department of Agriculture and at least 20 miles
outside of the geographic boundaries of an area designated as
urban by the United States Department of Agriculture, or in a city
whose population is less than 60,000, the business will, not later
than the date which is 2 years after the date on which the
deduction becomes effective, make a capital investment in the
county or city of:
(1) At least $1,000,000 if the business is an industrial or
manufacturing business; or
(2) At least $250,000 if the business is not an industrial or
manufacturing business,
 in capital assets that will be retained at the location of the
business in that county or city until at least the date which is 5
years after the date on which the deduction becomes effective.
-
*SB461*

– 30 –
3. If a partial deduction from the taxes imposed by this
chapter on personal property is approved by the Office of
Economic Development pursuant to section 3 of this act:
(a) The partial deduction must be:
(1) For a duration of at least 1 year but not more than 10
years;
(2) Subject to the limitations set forth in subsections 5 and
6 of section 3 of this act, in an amount calculated pursuant to
subsection 3 of section 3 of this act; and
(3) Administered and carried out in the manner set forth in
section 3 of this act.
(b) The Executive Director of the Office of Economic
Development shall notify the county assessor of the county in
which the business is or will be located of the approval of the
partial deduction, including, without limitation, the duration and
percentage of the partial deduction that the Office granted. The
Executive Director shall, on or before April 15 of each year,
advise the county assessor of each county in which a business
qualified for a partial deduction during the current fiscal year as
to whether the business is still eligible for the partial deduction in
the next succeeding fiscal year.
4. As used in this section, “high-impact business” has the
meaning ascribed to it in section 3 of this act.
Sec. 14. Chapter 363B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. An employer who intends to locate or expand a high-
impact business in this State may, pursuant to section 3 of this act,
apply to the Office of Economic Development for a partial
deduction from the taxes otherwise due pursuant to
NRS 363B.110.
2. If a partial deduction from the taxes otherwise due
pursuant to NRS 363B.110 is approved by the Office of Economic
Development pursuant to section 3 of this act, the partial
deduction must be:
(a) For a duration of at least 1 year but not more than 10
years.
(b) Administered and carried out in the manner set forth in
section 3 of this act.
(c) In the amount calculated pursuant to subsection 3 of
section 3 of this act, subject to the limitations set forth in
subsections 5 and 6 of section 3 of this act.
3. As used in this section, “high-impact business” has the
meaning ascribed to it in section 3 of this act.
-
*SB461*

– 31 –
Sec. 15. Chapter 374 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A person who expands or intends to locate a business in
this State may, pursuant to section 3 of this act, apply to the Office
of Economic Development for a partial deduction from the taxes
imposed by this chapter on the gross receipts from the sale, and
the storage, use or other consumption, of eligible machinery or
equipment for use by a business which has been approved for a
partial deduction pursuant to section 3 of this act.
2. If an application for a partial deduction is approved
pursuant to section 3 of this act:
(a) The taxpayer is eligible for a deduction from the tax
imposed by this chapter for a duration of at least 1 year but not
more than 10 years.
(b) The deduction must be administered and carried out in the
manner set forth in section 3 of this act.
(c) Subject to the limitations set forth in subsections 5 and 6 of
section 3 of this act, the deduction must be in the amount
calculated pursuant to subsection 3 of section 3 of this act.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Eligible machinery or equipment” means machinery or
equipment for which a deduction is authorized pursuant to 26
U.S.C. § 179. The term does not include:
(1) Buildings or the structural components of buildings;
(2) Equipment used by a public utility;
(3) Equipment used for medical treatment;
(4) Machinery or equipment used in mining; or
(5) Machinery or equipment used in gaming.
(b) “High-impact business” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 3 of this act.
Sec. 16. NRS 218D.355 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218D.355 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 360.753,
360.754, 360.893 and 360.965, and section 3 of this act, any state
legislation enacted on or after July 1, 2012, which authorizes or
requires the Office of Economic Development to approve any
abatement or deduction of taxes or increases the amount of any
abatement or deduction of taxes which the Office is authorized or
required to approve:
(a) Expires by limitation 10 years after the effective date of that
legislation.
(b) Does not apply to:
(1) Any taxes imposed pursuant to NRS 374.110 and
374.111 or 374.190 and 374.191; or
(2) Any entity that receives:
-
*SB461*

– 32 –
(I) Any funding from a governmental entity, other than
any private activity bonds as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 141; or
(II) Any real or personal property from a governmental
entity at no cost or at a reduced cost.
(c) Requires each recipient of the abatement or deduction to
submit to the Department of Taxation, on or before the last day of
each even-numbered year, a report on whether the recipient is in
compliance with the terms of the abatement [.] or deduction. The
Department of Taxation shall establish a form for the report and
may adopt such regulations as it determines to be appropriate to
carry out this paragraph. The report must include, without
limitation:
(1) The date the recipient commenced operation in this State;
(2) The number of employees actually employed by the
recipient and the average hourly wage of those employees;
(3) An accounting of any fees paid by the recipient to the
State and to local governmental entities;
(4) An accounting of the property taxes paid by the recipient
and the amount of those taxes that would have been due if not for
the abatement [;] or deduction;
(5) An accounting of the sales and use taxes paid by the
recipient and the amount of those taxes that would have been due if
not for the abatement [;] or deduction;
(6) An accounting of the total capital investment made in
connection with the project to which the abatement or deduction
applies; and
(7) An accounting of the total investment in personal
property made in connection with the project to which the
abatement or deduction applies.
2. On or before January 15 of each odd-numbered year, the
Department of Taxation shall:
(a) Based upon the information submitted to the Department of
Taxation pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 1, prepare a written
report of its findings regarding whether the costs of the abatement or
deduction exceed the benefits of the abatement [;] or deduction;
and
(b) Submit the report to the Director for transmittal to the
Legislature.
Sec. 17. Chapter 231 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 18 and 19 of this act.
Sec. 18. “Primary jobs” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 2 of this act.
Sec. 19. 1. The Office shall establish and administer a
Community Infrastructure Grant Program as a competitive grant
program to award grants, in accordance with this section, to
-
*SB461*

– 33 –
qualified entities to construct qualified infrastructure projects or
rural housing projects.
2. The Community Infrastructure Grant Program Account is
hereby created in the State General Fund. The Executive Director
shall administer the Account.
3. The interest and income earned on money in the Account,
after deducting any applicable charges, must be credited to the
Account.
4. Any money remaining in the Account at the end of the
fiscal year does not revert to the State General Fund, and the
balance in the Account must be carried forward to the next fiscal
year.
5. The Executive Director may accept gifts, grants and
donations from any source for deposit in the Account. Such gifts,
grants and donations must not be used to reduce or supplant the
amount or percentage of any money that would otherwise be made
available to carry out the provisions of this section.
6. The money in the Account must only be used to award
grants to qualified entities to pay the costs associated with
constructing a qualified infrastructure project or rural housing
project that:
(a) Is necessary to facilitate the expansion or relocation of a
business within the State or to address a critical housing shortage
in a rural area;
(b) Supports the creation of primary jobs; and
(c) Addresses:
(1) A recognized infrastructure need that aligns with the
State Plan for Economic Development and contributes to the
development of industries which are identified in the State Plan
for Economic Development as industries that should be targeted
for development; or
(2) A critical housing need in a rural area and will enhance
community sustainability and economic growth.
7. The Office shall use not more than 50 percent of the total
funds appropriated to the Account to provide grants for rural
housing projects.
8. The Office shall, in consultation with the Housing Division
of the Department of Business and Industry, regional development
authorities and local governments, adopt a process for qualified
entities to apply for a grant from the Account. The application
must include, without limitation:
(a) A detailed description of the project for which the grant is
sought, including, without limitation, the scope of work, the
location of the project and the projected cost of the project;
-
*SB461*

– 34 –
(b) A demonstration that the project will address a recognized
infrastructure need that aligns with the State Plan for Economic
Development or address a critical housing need in a rural area;
(c) Evidence that the project is supported by the local
government of the jurisdiction in which the project will be located
and the regional development agency for that location;
(d) A plan to finance the project, including the sources of
funding for the project, and the timeline to complete the project;
and
(e) An analysis of the anticipated economic and social benefits
that the project will provide to the State and the local community,
including, without limitation, the creation of jobs, increases to tax
revenues or the availability of housing.
9. In awarding grants from the Account, the Office shall
prioritize applications for projects that:
(a) Eliminate infrastructure barriers that prevent the location
or expansion of businesses in this State;
(b) Provide long-term benefits that stabilize and diversify the
tax base of the State;
(c) Align with regional and state economic development goals;
(d) Will allow the State to attract or retain businesses in
industries that are targeted for growth under the State Plan for
Economic Development; and
(e) Leverage local, federal or private sources of funding to
maximize the financial impact of a grant from the Account.
10. The Office shall adopt regulations necessary to carry out
the provisions of this section.
11. As used in this section:
(a) “Qualified entity” means:
(1) A regional development authority that is assisting a new
or expanding business that requires infrastructure improvements
to support the expansion or relocation of the business;
(2) A local government seeking financial assistance for a
project that is necessary to support the expansion or relocation of
a business or the development of housing in the jurisdiction of the
local government; or
(3) An entity which has executed an agreement with a local
government for the development of a rural housing project in a
rural area.
(b) “Qualified infrastructure project” means:
(1) A project for the construction of new or extended utility
infrastructure, including, without limitation, water, sewer, gas,
electric or broadband infrastructure;
-
*SB461*

– 35 –
(2) A project for the construction of transportation
infrastructure, including, without limitation, roads, bridges or
public transit infrastructure;
(3) The acquisition of land or site preparation necessary to
construct infrastructure;
(4) A project for the construction of infrastructure
necessary to support a residential housing development, including,
without limitation, housing that is for sale, housing that is for rent
or workforce housing;
(5) A project for the construction of a wastewater treatment
plant, a storm water management system, a renewable energy
project or other public facilities; or
(6) Any other project for the construction of infrastructure
which the Office determines is necessary for economic
development or to address a critical housing shortage.
(c) “Rural area” means:
(1) A county whose population is less than 100,000; or
(2) An incorporated city whose population is less than
60,000.
Sec. 20. NRS 231.002 is hereby amended to read as follows:
231.002 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 231.003 to 231.0095,
inclusive, and section 18 of this act, have the meanings ascribed to
them in those sections.
Sec. 21. NRS 231.053 is hereby amended to read as follows:
231.053 After considering any advice and recommendations of
the Board, the Executive Director:
1. Shall direct and supervise the administrative and technical
activities of the Office.
2. Shall develop and [may periodically] , at least biennially,
revise a State Plan for Economic Development, which:
(a) Must include a statement of:
(1) New industries which have the potential to be developed
in this State [;] , including, without limitation:
(I) High-impact businesses, as defined in section 3 of
this act; and
(II) Industries which should be targeted for development
because they offer the greatest potential for economic growth and
diversification in this State;
(2) The strengths and weaknesses of this State for business
incubation;
(3) The competitive advantages and weaknesses of this State;
(4) The manner in which this State can leverage its
competitive advantages and address its competitive weaknesses;
-
*SB461*

– 36 –
(5) The manner in which this State can maximize the
efficient use of the water resources of this State through the
programs of economic development in this State;
(6) A strategy to encourage the creation and expansion of
businesses in this State and the relocation of businesses to this State
[;] , including, without limitation, businesses that will reduce the
reliance of the State on imported goods and services through
import substitution in sectors identified as critical to the economic
security of the State, including, without limitation, mineral
processing, battery production and health care; and
(7) Potential partners for the implementation of the strategy,
including, without limitation, the Federal Government, local
governments, local and regional organizations for economic
development, chambers of commerce, and private businesses,
investors and nonprofit entities; [and]
(b) Must include recommendations for workforce development
strategies, infrastructure improvements and community
engagement initiatives which will support the growth of the
industries identified pursuant to paragraph (a); and
(c) Must not include provisions for the granting of any
abatement, partial abatement , partial deduction or exemption from
taxes or any other incentive for economic development to a person
who will locate or expand a business in this State that is subject to
the tax imposed pursuant to NRS 362.130 or the gaming license fees
imposed by the provisions of NRS 463.370.
3. Shall develop criteria for the designation of regional
development authorities pursuant to subsection 4.
4. Shall designate as many regional development authorities
for each region of this State as the Executive Director determines to
be appropriate to implement the State Plan for Economic
Development. In designating regional development authorities, the
Executive Director must consult with local governmental entities
affected by the designation. The Executive Director may, if he or
she determines that such action would aid in the implementation of
the State Plan for Economic Development, remove the designation
of any regional development authority previously designated
pursuant to this section and declare void any contract between the
Office and that regional development authority.
5. Shall establish procedures for entering into contracts with
regional development authorities to provide services to aid, promote
and encourage the economic development of this State.
6. May apply for and accept any gift, donation, bequest, grant
or other source of money to carry out the provisions of NRS
231.020 to 231.139, inclusive, and 231.1555 to 231.1597, inclusive.
-
*SB461*

– 37 –
7. May adopt such regulations as may be necessary to carry out
the provisions of NRS 231.020 to 231.139, inclusive, and 231.1555
to 231.1597, inclusive.
8. In a manner consistent with the laws of this State, may
reorganize the programs of economic development in this State to
further the State Plan for Economic Development. If, in the opinion
of the Executive Director, changes to the laws of this State are
necessary to implement the economic development strategy for this
State, the Executive Director must recommend the changes to the
Governor and the Legislature.
Sec. 22. NRS 231.0685 is hereby amended to read as follows:
231.0685 The Office shall, on or before January 15 of each
odd-numbered year, prepare and submit to the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmission to the Legislature a
report concerning the abatements from taxation that the Office
approved pursuant to NRS 274.310, 274.320, 274.330, 360.750,
360.753 or 360.754 [.] and the deductions that the Office approved
pursuant to section 3 of this act. The report must set forth, for each
abatement or deduction from taxation that the Office approved
during the fiscal years which are 3 fiscal years and 6 fiscal years
immediately preceding the submission of the report:
1. The dollar amount of the abatement [;] or deduction;
2. The location of the business for which the abatement or
deduction was approved;
3. The value of infrastructure included as an incentive for the
business;
4. If applicable, the number of employees that the business for
which the abatement or deduction was approved employs or will
employ;
5. Whether the business for which the abatement or deduction
was approved is a new business or an existing business;
6. The economic sector in which the business operates, the
number of primary jobs related to the business, the average wage
paid to employees of the business and the assessed values of
personal property and real property of the business;
7. Any information concerning whether the business for which
the abatement or deduction was approved participates or has
participated in a program of workforce development, as defined in
NRS 231.146, implemented by the Executive Director; and
8. Any other information that the Office determines to be
useful.
Sec. 23. NRS 231.1467 is hereby amended to read as follows:
231.1467 1. A person who wishes to provide a program of
workforce recruitment, assessment and training may apply to the
-
*SB461*

– 38 –
Office for approval of the program. The application must be
submitted on a form prescribed by the Office.
2. Each application must include:
(a) The name, address, electronic mail address and telephone
number of the applicant;
(b) The name of each business for which the applicant will
provide the proposed program of workforce recruitment, assessment
and training;
(c) A statement of the objectives of the proposed program of
workforce recruitment, assessment and training;
(d) A description of the primary economic sector to be served by
the proposed program of workforce recruitment, assessment and
training;
(e) Evidence of workforce shortages within the industry to be
served by the proposed program of workforce recruitment,
assessment and training;
(f) Evidence that there is an insufficient number of existing
programs to develop the workforce needed for the industry to be
served by the proposed program of workforce recruitment,
assessment and training;
(g) A statement of the number and types of jobs with the
business for which the applicant will provide the proposed program
of workforce recruitment, assessment and training that are available
or will be available upon completion of the proposed program;
(h) A statement demonstrating the past performance of the
applicant in providing programs of workforce development,
including, without limitation:
(1) The number and type of credentials and certifications
issued by programs of workforce development provided by the
applicant; and
(2) The number of businesses successfully served by the
programs of workforce development provided by the applicant;
(i) A proposed plan for the provision of the proposed program of
workforce recruitment, assessment and training on a statewide basis;
(j) A list of facilities that will be used by the proposed program
of workforce recruitment, assessment and training;
(k) A projection of the number of [primary] jobs in target
industries identified in the State Plan for Economic Development
that will be served by the proposed program of workforce
recruitment, assessment and training and the wages for those jobs;
(l) Evidence satisfactory to the Office that the proposed program
of workforce recruitment, assessment and training is consistent with
the unified state plan submitted by the Governor to the Secretary of
Labor pursuant to 29 U.S.C. § 3112;
(m) A workforce [diversity] development action plan;
-
*SB461*

– 39 –
(n) The estimated cost of the proposed program of workforce
recruitment, assessment and training;
(o) A statement by the business for which the applicant will
provide the proposed program of workforce recruitment, assessment
and training, which commits the business to report to the Office
required performance metrics to enable the Office to comply with
NRS 231.1513;
(p) A report from each business for which the applicant will
provide the proposed program of workforce recruitment, assessment
and training, which sets forth the basis for any furloughs or layoffs
conducted by the business in the 12 months immediately preceding
the date of the application for the job categories related to the
proposed program of workforce recruitment, assessment and
training; and
(q) Any other information requested by the Executive Director.
3. Any program of workforce recruitment, assessment and
training approved by the Office pursuant to this section must:
(a) Include a workforce [diversity] development action plan
approved by the Office;
(b) To the extent practicable, be provided on a statewide basis to
support the industrial and economic development of all geographic
areas of this State; and
(c) Result in a postsecondary or industry-recognized credential,
or an identifiable occupational skill that meets the applicable
industry standard.
4. The Office shall:
(a) Maintain on the Internet website of the Office a list of the
criteria for evaluating applications for approval of a program of
workforce recruitment, assessment and training;
(b) Ensure, through coordination with relevant state agencies
and by reviewing any notices required pursuant to the federal
Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act, 29 U.S.C. §§
2101 et. seq., and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto, that each
business for which an applicant that submitted an application
pursuant to this section will provide a program of workforce
recruitment, assessment and training:
(1) Is in compliance with the laws of this State pertaining to
the conduct of businesses and employers;
(2) Is not excluded from receiving contracts from the Federal
Government as a result of being debarred; and
(3) Has included in the report submitted pursuant to
paragraph (p) of subsection 2 the basis for each furlough or layoff
conducted in the 12 months immediately preceding the date of the
application for the job categories related to the proposed program of
workforce recruitment, assessment and training;
-
*SB461*

– 40 –
(c) Approve or disapprove each application for approval of a
program of workforce recruitment, assessment and training within
60 days after receiving a complete application; and
(d) Provide notice of the approval or disapproval of each
application to the applicant within 10 days after approving or
disapproving the application.
5. An authorized provider that provides a program of
workforce recruitment, assessment and training approved by the
Office pursuant to this section or the governing body of a local
government within the jurisdiction of which the authorized provider
will provide the program may apply to the Office for an allocation,
grant or loan of money to defray in whole or in part the cost of the
program. The application must be submitted on a form prescribed by
the Office.
6. The Office shall approve or deny each application for an
allocation, grant or loan of money submitted pursuant to subsection
5 within 45 days after receipt of the application. When considering
an application, the Office shall give priority to a program of
workforce recruitment, assessment and training that will provide
workforce development services to one or more businesses that:
(a) Provide high-skill and high-wage jobs to residents of this
State, as defined by the Board of Economic Development;
(b) Provide postsecondary or industry-recognized credentials or
identifiable skills meeting the applicable industry standard, which
are not otherwise offered or not otherwise offered at scale in this
State;
(c) Impart a course of study for not more than 12 months that
delivers skills that are needed in the workforce;
(d) To the greatest extent practicable, use materials that are
produced or bought in this State;
(e) Are consistent with the State Plan for Economic
Development developed by the Executive Director pursuant to
subsection 2 of NRS 231.053; and
(f) Are consistent with the unified state plan submitted by the
Governor to the Secretary of Labor pursuant to 29 U.S.C. § 3112.
7. An authorized provider may use money distributed pursuant
to this section:
(a) To provide curriculum development and instructional
services;
(b) To pay for equipment or technology necessary to conduct the
training;
(c) To pay training fees or tuition for the program of workforce
recruitment, assessment and training, which are not otherwise
covered by the program budget or other workforce development
funding;
-
*SB461*

– 41 –
(d) To promote the program of workforce recruitment,
assessment and training and for job recruiting and assessments
conducted through the program;
(e) To provide analysis of on-site training;
(f) To pay any costs relating to the rental of instructional
facilities, including, without limitation, utilities and costs relating to
the storage and transportation of equipment and supplies;
(g) To pay administrative and personnel costs, except that not
more than 10 percent of the money distributed pursuant to this
section is used for such purposes; and
(h) To pay any other costs, not including administrative and
personnel costs, necessary to effectively carry out the program of
workforce recruitment, assessment and training.
8. Equipment purchased with money distributed as a grant
pursuant to this section is the property of the Office. At the end of
the grant period, the Office may recapture the equipment for
redistribution to other programs of workforce recruitment,
assessment and training provided by an authorized provider.
9. A business in this State may apply to the Office to
participate in an approved program of workforce recruitment,
assessment and training provided by an authorized provider. The
application must be submitted on a form prescribed by the Office
and must include, without limitation:
(a) The name, address and telephone number of the business;
(b) Proof satisfactory to the Office that the business is consistent
with the State Plan for Economic Development developed by the
Executive Director pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 231.053;
(c) A description of the number and types of jobs that the
business expects will be created as a result of its participation in the
program of workforce recruitment, assessment and training and
the wages the business expects to pay to persons employed in those
jobs;
(d) The types of services which will be provided to the business
through the program of workforce recruitment, assessment and
training;
(e) A workforce [diversity] development action plan approved
by the Office; and
(f) Any other information required by the Office.
Sec. 24. NRS 231.151 is hereby amended to read as follows:
231.151 1. The Workforce Innovations for a New Nevada
Account is hereby created in the State General Fund. Any money
the Office receives pursuant to NRS 231.149 or that is appropriated
to carry out the provisions of NRS 231.141 to 231.152, inclusive [:]
, or 388.380:
-
*SB461*

– 42 –
(a) Must be deposited in the State General Fund for credit to the
Account; and
(b) May only be used to carry out those provisions.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the balance
remaining in the Account that has not been committed for
expenditure on or before June 30 of an odd-numbered fiscal year
reverts to the State General Fund.
3. In calculating the uncommitted remaining balance in the
Account at the end of an odd-numbered fiscal year, any money in
the Account that is attributable to a gift, grant, donation or
contribution:
(a) To the extent not inconsistent with a term of the gift, grant,
donation or contribution, shall be deemed to have been committed
for expenditure before any money that is attributable to a legislative
appropriation; and
(b) Must be excluded from the calculation of the uncommitted
remaining balance in the Account at the end of each odd-numbered
fiscal year if necessary to comply with a term of the gift, grant,
donation or contribution.
4. The Office shall administer the Account. Any interest or
income earned on the money in the Account must be credited to the
Account. Any claims against the Account must be paid as other
claims against the State are paid.
Sec. 25. NRS 231.1513 is hereby amended to read as follows:
231.1513 The Office shall, on or before January 15 of each
odd-numbered year, prepare and submit to the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmission to the Legislature a
report concerning programs of workforce development which
receive money from the Workforce Innovations for a New Nevada
Account created by NRS 231.151. The report must include:
1. A summary of the expenditures from the Account;
2. A summary of the outcomes of the programs of workforce
development which receive money from the Account, including,
without limitation, the number of persons trained by each program,
the number of persons employed by businesses that participate in
each program and the average wages of the employees who are
hired through each program;
3. An evaluation of the workforce [diversity] development
action plan of each authorized provider and each business that
participates in a program of workforce development; and
4. Any other information the Executive Director of the Office
determines is appropriate.
Sec. 26. NRS 231A.155 is hereby amended to read as follows:
231A.155 1. For the purposes of NRS 231A.0753, an impact
qualified active low-income community business is limited to those
-
*SB461*

– 43 –
businesses which have their principal business operations in this
State and:
(a) Whose primary North American Industry Classification
System classification is within sector 31, 32 or 33 or sector 44 or 45;
or
(b) Are businesses that have 51 percent or more of its ownership
interest held by women, disabled veterans, persons who are lesbian,
gay, bisexual or transgender or members of a racial or ethnic
minority group.
2. A business must be considered an impact qualified active
low-income community business for the duration of the impact
qualified community development entity’s investment in, or loan to,
the business if the entity reasonably expects, at the time it makes the
investment or loan, that the business will continue to satisfy the
requirements for being an impact qualified active low-income
community business throughout the entire period of the investment
or loan.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the
businesses limited by this section do not include any business that
derives or projects to derive 15 percent or more of its annual
revenue from the rental or sale of real estate. This exclusion does
not apply to a business that is controlled by, or under common
control with, another business if the second business:
(a) Does not derive or project to derive 15 percent or more of its
annual revenue from the rental or sale of real estate; and
(b) Is the primary tenant of the real estate leased from the first
business.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, the following
businesses are not impact qualified active low-income community
businesses:
(a) A business that has received an abatement from taxation
pursuant to NRS 274.310, 274.320, 274.330, 360.750, 360.753 or
360.754 [.] or a deduction pursuant to section 3 of this act.
(b) An entity that has liability for insurance premium tax on a
premium tax report filed pursuant to NRS 680B.030.
(c) A business engaged in banking or lending.
(d) A massage parlor.
(e) A bath house.
(f) A tanning salon.
(g) A country club.
(h) A business operating under a nonrestricted license for
gaming issued pursuant to NRS 463.170.
(i) A liquor store.
(j) A golf course.
-
*SB461*

– 44 –
5. A business that has received an abatement from taxation
pursuant to NRS 274.310, 274.320, 274.330, 360.750, 360.753 or
360.754 or a deduction pursuant to section 3 of this act is an
impact qualified active low-income community business if the
business elects to waive the abatement or deduction and provides
written notice of the waiver of the abatement or deduction to the
Office of Economic Development not later than the due date of the
first payment of any tax which would be abated or deducted if
the abatement or deduction became effective. If the business
provides the written notice to the Office of Economic Development:
(a) Within the period required by this subsection:
(1) Any agreement entered into by the business and the
Office of Economic Development pursuant to NRS 274.310,
274.320, 274.330, 360.750, 360.753 or 360.754 or section 3 of this
act is void; and
(2) The Office of Economic Development must forward a
copy of the written notice to the Department and each governmental
entity or official to whom a copy of the certificate of eligibility for
the abatement or deduction was forwarded.
(b) After the period required by this subsection has expired, the
Office of Economic Development must provide written notice to the
Department and the business that the abatement or deduction has
not been waived and the business is not an impact qualified active
low-income community business.
Sec. 27. NRS 231A.170 is hereby amended to read as follows:
231A.170 1. For the purpose of NRS 231A.110, a qualified
active low-income community business is limited to those
businesses meeting the Small Business Administration size
eligibility standards established in 13 C.F.R. §§ 121.101 to 201,
inclusive, at the time the qualified low-income community
investment is made. A business must be considered a qualified
active low-income community business for the duration of the
qualified community development entity’s investment in, or loan to,
the business if the entity reasonably expects, at the time it makes the
investment or loan, that the business will continue to satisfy the
requirements for being a qualified active low-income community
business, other than the Small Business Administration size
standards, throughout the entire period of the investment or loan.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the
businesses limited by this section do not include any business that
derives or projects to derive 15 percent or more of its annual
revenue from the rental or sale of real estate. This exclusion does
not apply to a business that is controlled by, or under common
control with, another business if the second business:
-
*SB461*

– 45 –
(a) Does not derive or project to derive 15 percent or more of its
annual revenue from the rental or sale of real estate; and
(b) Is the primary tenant of the real estate leased from the first
business.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the following
businesses are not qualified active low-income community
businesses:
(a) A business that has received an abatement from taxation
pursuant to NRS 274.310, 274.320, 274.330, 360.750, 360.753 or
360.754 [.] or a deduction pursuant to section 3 of this act.
(b) An entity that has liability for insurance premium tax on a
premium tax report filed pursuant to NRS 680B.030.
(c) A business engaged in banking or lending.
(d) A massage parlor.
(e) A bath house.
(f) A tanning salon.
(g) A country club.
(h) A business operating under a nonrestricted license for
gaming issued pursuant to NRS 463.170.
(i) A liquor store.
(j) A golf course.
4. A business that has received an abatement from taxation
pursuant to NRS 274.310, 274.320, 274.330, 360.750, 360.753 or
360.754 or a deduction pursuant to section 3 of this act is a
qualified active low-income community business if the business
elects to waive the abatement or deduction and provides written
notice of the waiver of the abatement or deduction to the Office of
Economic Development not later than the due date of the first
payment of any tax which would be abated or deducted if the
abatement or deduction became effective. If the business provides
the written notice to the Office of Economic Development:
(a) Within the period required by this subsection:
(1) Any agreement entered into by the business and the
Office of Economic Development pursuant to NRS 274.310,
274.320, 274.330, 360.750, 360.753 or 360.754 or section 3 of this
act is void; and
(2) The Office of Economic Development must forward a
copy of the written notice to the Department and each governmental
entity or official to whom a copy of the certificate of eligibility for
the abatement or deduction was forwarded.
(b) After the period required by this subsection has expired, the
Office of Economic Development must provide written notice to the
Department and the business that the abatement or deduction has
not been waived and the business is not a qualified active low-
income community business.
-
*SB461*

– 46 –
Sec. 28. Chapter 232 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Department and the Office of Economic Development
shall jointly establish a program to reimburse qualified persons
who are or were enrolled in an institution within the Nevada
System of Higher Education for:
(a) Tuition, registration fees or other mandatory fees to enroll
in courses that lead to an undergraduate degree or certificate in a
trade-related field at an institution within the System.
(b) Living expenses, educational supplies and other expenses
associated with completing a program that leads to an
undergraduate degree or certificate in a trade-related field at an
institution within the System.
2. A person who receives reimbursement pursuant to this
section must repay the amount of the reimbursement unless the
person:
(a) Completes the program in a trade-related field for which
the reimbursement was received.
(b) Maintains employment in a trade-related field in a rural
county for not less than 2 years after completing the program.
(c) Commences his or her employment in a trade-related field
in a rural county within 1 year after completing the program.
3. The Office of Economic Development shall:
(a) In coordination with the Department of Education and the
Department, establish criteria to review and approve applications
for reimbursement submitted pursuant to this section.
(b) Collaborate with employers and industry representatives in
rural counties to create job placement programs that align with
the education and skills acquired by persons who complete
programs in trade-related fields provided by an institution within
the Nevada System of Higher Education, giving priority to
programs that will support the hiring of qualified persons who
receive reimbursement pursuant to this section and for which
alternative programs are not available, including, without
limitation, construction, health care, renewable energy and
advanced manufacturing.
(c) On or before August 1 of each year, publish a report on the
Internet website of the Office detailing the number of qualified
persons who received reimbursement pursuant to this section and
the impact of the program established pursuant to subsection 1 on
workforce development in rural counties.
(d) Adopt regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of
this section, including, without limitation, regulations
establishing:
-
*SB461*

– 47 –
(1) The form and requirements for any application for
reimbursement pursuant to this section.
(2) The fields that are trade-related fields for the purposes
of this section.
(3) The terms under which repayment must be made
pursuant to subsection 2.
(4) Any reporting requirements or other mechanisms that
will be used by the Office to track compliance with the
requirements of subsection 2.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Qualified person” means a person who has successfully
completed a program of career and technical education provided
by a school district pursuant to NRS 388.380.
(b) “Rural county” means a county whose population is less
than 100,000.
Sec. 29. NRS 232.900 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.900 As used in NRS 232.900 to 232.990, inclusive, and
section 28 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires:
1. “Department” means the Department of Employment,
Training and Rehabilitation.
2. “Director” means the Director of the Department.
Sec. 30. NRS 353.207 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.207 1. The Chief shall:
(a) Require the Office of Economic Development and the Office
of Energy each periodically to conduct an analysis of the relative
costs and benefits of each incentive for economic development
previously approved by the respective office and in effect during the
immediately preceding 2 fiscal years, including, without limitation,
any abatement of taxes approved by the Office of Economic
Development pursuant to NRS 274.310, 274.320, 274.330, 360.750,
360.753, 360.754, 360.890, 360.950, 361.0687, 374.357 or
701A.210, or a deduction approved pursuant to section 3 of this
act, to assist the Governor and the Legislature in determining
whether the economic benefits of the incentive have accomplished
the purposes of the statute pursuant to which the incentive was
approved and warrant additional incentives of that kind;
(b) Require each office to report in writing to the Chief the
results of the analysis conducted by the office pursuant to paragraph
(a); and
(c) Establish a schedule for performing and reporting the results
of the analysis required by paragraph (a) which ensures that the
results of the analysis reported by each office are included in the
proposed budget prepared pursuant to NRS 353.205, as required by
that section.
-
*SB461*

– 48 –
2. Each report prepared for the Chief pursuant to this section is
a public record and is open to inspection pursuant to the provisions
of NRS 239.010.
Sec. 31. Chapter 388 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. To the extent money is made available for this purpose by
the Department of Employment, Training and Rehabilitation, the
State Board shall, in collaboration with the Department of
Employment, Training and Rehabilitation and the Office of
Economic Development, establish a program to incentivize
industry professionals to act as part-time teachers for programs of
career and technical education by providing stipends to the
employer of such industry professionals to reimburse them for the
time such employees dedicate to teaching.
2. Under the program established pursuant to subsection 1,
employers may receive a stipend for up to 120 hours of teaching
time per year, at a fixed hourly rate established by the State Board.
3. An employer that applies for and is approved for a stipend
pursuant to this section may elect to donate the amount of the
stipend to the school district in which the employee teaches to be
used for costs associated with the program of career and technical
education.
4. An employer that receives a stipend must provide the
employee with the full compensation and benefits which the
employee would receive if the employee was not acting as a part-
time teacher for a program of career and technical education.
5. The employee for whom a stipend is received must be
qualified to act as a teacher of career and technical education by
holding the appropriate license to teach such a course.
6. The State Board shall adopt regulations necessary to carry
out the provisions of this section, including, without limitation,
provisions establishing:
(a) The eligibility requirements for employers to receive a
stipend;
(b) The process for applying for a stipend; and
(c) A requirement for each employer that receives a stipend to
submit an annual report detailing the number of hours taught by
the employees of the employer and the impact of the employee’s
work as an instructor for a program of career and technical
education.
Sec. 32. NRS 388.380 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.380 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the
board of trustees of a school district in a county whose population is
100,000 or more shall and any other board of trustees of a school
district may:
-
*SB461*

– 49 –
(a) Establish and maintain a program of career and technical
education [giving] :
(1) Giving instruction in the subjects approved by the State
Board [.] ; and
(2) Which includes curricula designed in cooperation with
local businesses through talent pipeline agreements pursuant to
subsection 5.
(b) Raise and expend money [for the] :
(1) For the establishment and maintenance of a program of
career and technical education.
(2) To support partnerships under talent pipeline
agreements entered into pursuant to subsection 5.
2. A pupil who successfully completes a program of career and
technical education and who otherwise satisfies the requirements for
graduation from high school must be awarded a high school diploma
with an endorsement indicating that the pupil has successfully
completed the program of career and technical education. The
provisions of this subsection do not preclude a pupil from receiving
more than one endorsement on his or her diploma, if applicable.
3. The board of trustees of each school district shall
incorporate into the curriculum:
(a) Guidance and counseling in career and technical education in
accordance with NRS 389.041; [and]
(b) Technology [.] ; and
(c) Work-based learning that includes practical, hands-on
learning experiences provided through internships,
apprenticeships or short-term career experiences in collaboration
with local businesses under a talent pipeline agreement entered
into pursuant to subsection 5.
4. The State Board shall adopt regulations [prescribing] :
(a) Prescribing the endorsement of career and technical
education for a high school diploma.
(b) Establishing criteria which businesses must meet to be
eligible to enter into a talent pipeline agreement.
(c) Necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
5. The board of trustees of a school district that offers a
program of career and technical education shall enter into talent
pipeline agreements with local businesses to facilitate the
participation of pupils in internships, apprenticeships and short-
term career experiences. A talent pipeline agreement must be
designed to align programs of career and technical education with
local workforce needs and must include:
(a) Annual career experiences for pupils, including, without
limitation, job shadowing, site tours or other short-term
experiences which expose pupils to career options.
-
*SB461*

– 50 –
(b) Paid or unpaid internships and apprenticeships offered to
pupils during the summer or as part-time positions during the
school year.
(c) Agreements by businesses to prioritize the hiring of high
school graduates who have completed an internship,
apprenticeship or other career readiness activity under the talent
pipeline agreement.
(d) Career counseling for pupils, including, without limitation,
guidance on navigating internship and apprenticeship
opportunities and understanding employment opportunities that
are available after graduation.
6. The Office of Economic Development, in collaboration
with the Department, shall establish a program to award grants to
school districts that have active talent pipeline agreements with
local businesses using funds from the Workforce Innovations for
a New Nevada Account created by NRS 231.151. Such grant
funding may be used to improve or expand the programs of career
and technical education within the recipient school district,
including, without limitation, by:
(a) Purchasing equipment upgrades relevant to the industry
sectors for which the school district has active talent pipeline
agreements; or
(b) Constructing or renovating shared training spaces used by
pupils and participating businesses.
7. On or before January 15 of each year, a business which is
party to an active talent pipeline agreement shall submit to the
State Board and the Office of Economic Development a report that
includes, without limitation:
(a) The number of pupils who participated in internships,
apprenticeships or other career experiences in the immediately
preceding year.
(b) The number of employees currently employed by the
business who, as pupils, participated in internships,
apprenticeships or other career experiences under the talent
pipeline agreement.
Sec. 33. NRS 701A.210 is hereby amended to read as follows:
701A.210 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
Office of Economic Development may grant a business a partial
abatement from the taxes imposed on real property pursuant to
chapter 361 of NRS if : [a:]
(a) [Business that engages] The business:
(1) Engages in the primary trade of preparing, fabricating,
manufacturing or otherwise processing raw material or an
intermediate product through a process in which at least 50 percent
of the material or product is recycled on-site; [or
-
*SB461*

– 51 –
(b) Business that includes]
(2) Includes as a primary component a facility for the
generation of electricity from recycled material [,
 is found by the Office of Economic Development to have] or a
facility for the production of biofuels, biomass or other primary
fuels for energy production from recycled material; or
(3) Primarily engages in the recycling or repurposing of
materials that were used to produce or store renewable energy,
including, without limitation, materials used in solar panels or
waste materials resulting from the extraction of minerals;
(b) The Office finds that the business has as a primary purpose
the conservation of energy , [or] the substitution of other sources of
energy for fossil sources of energy [and] or the advancement of the
environmental sustainability and energy goals of this State;
(c) The business obtains certification from the Office [of
Economic Development] pursuant to NRS 360.750 [, the Office
may, if the] ; and
(d) The business [additionally] satisfies the requirements set
forth in subsection 2 of NRS 361.0687 . [, grant to the business a
partial abatement from the taxes imposed on real property pursuant
to chapter 361 of NRS.]
2. If a partial abatement from the taxes imposed on real
property pursuant to chapter 361 of NRS is approved by the Office
of Economic Development pursuant to NRS 360.750 for a business
described in subsection 1:
(a) The partial abatement must:
(1) Be for a duration of at least 1 year but not more than 10
years;
(2) Not exceed 50 percent of the taxes on real property
payable by the business each year; and
(3) Be administered and carried out in the manner set forth in
NRS 360.750.
(b) The Executive Director of the Office of Economic
Development shall notify the county assessor of the county in which
the business is located of the approval of the partial abatement,
including, without limitation, the duration and percentage of the
partial abatement that the Office granted. The Executive Director
shall, on or before April 15 of each year, advise the county assessor
of each county in which a business qualifies for a partial abatement
during the current fiscal year as to whether the business is still
eligible for the partial abatement in the next succeeding fiscal year.
3. The partial abatement provided in this section applies only
to the business for which certification was granted pursuant to NRS
360.750 and the property used in connection with that business. The
exemption does not apply to property in this State that is not related
-
*SB461*

– 52 –
to the business for which the certification was granted pursuant to
NRS 360.750 or to property in existence and subject to taxation
before the certification was granted.
4. As used in this section [, “facility] :
(a) “Anaerobic digestion” means the breaking down of
organic waste using anaerobic bacteria to create biofuel.
(b) “Biofuel” means any alcohol, ether, ester or other
chemical compound made from herbaceous plants, woody plants
or organic waste.
(c) “Biomass” means any organic matter that is available on a
renewable basis, including, without limitation:
(1) Agricultural crops and agricultural wastes and
residues;
(2) Wood and wood wastes and residues;
(3) Animal wastes;
(4) Municipal wastes; and
(5) Aquatic plants.
(d) “Facility for the generation of electricity from recycled
material” means a facility for the generation of electricity that uses
recycled material as its primary fuel, including material from:
[(a)] (1) Industrial or domestic waste, other than hazardous
waste, even though it includes a product made from oil, natural gas
or coal, such as plastics, asphalt shingles or tires;
[(b)] (2) Agricultural crops, whether terrestrial or aquatic, and
agricultural waste, such as manure and residue from crops; and
[(c)] (3) Municipal waste, such as sewage and sludge.
 The term includes all the equipment in the facility used to process
and convert into electricity the energy derived from a recycled
material fuel [.] and a facility for the generation of electricity
through modified microbial fuel cells.
(e) “Facility for the production of biofuels, biomass or other
primary fuels from recycled material” means a facility for the
production of biofuels, biomass or other primary fuels that uses
recycled material to produce biofuels, biomass or other primary
fuels for use in the generation of energy, including material from:
(1) Industrial or domestic waste, other than hazardous
waste, even though it includes a product made from oil, natural
gas or coal, such as plastics, asphalt shingles or tires;
(2) Agricultural crops, whether terrestrial or aquatic, and
agricultural waste, such as manure and residue from crops; and
(3) Municipal waste, such as sewage and sludge.
 The term includes all the equipment in the facility used to
process and convert into biofuels, biomass or other primary fuels
the energy derived from a recycled material and a facility for the
production of biofuels, biomass or other primary fuels through
-
*SB461*

– 53 –
gasification and pyrolysis, anaerobic digestion, the recovery of gas
from landfills, triboelectric devices or the recycling of solar
panels.
(f) “Gasification and pyrolysis” means the use of heat to
convert waste into synthesis gas.
(g) “Modified microbial fuel cell” means the use of
microorganisms to convert the chemical energy in organic waste
into electricity while simultaneously treating wastewater.
(h) “Recycled material” includes, without limitation, critical
materials, waste materials from the extraction of minerals and
products for the production or storage of renewable energy that
are recycled or repurposed.
(i) “Renewable energy”:
(1) Means:
(I) Biomass;
(II) Fuel cells;
(III) Geothermal energy;
(IV) Solar energy;
(V) Waterpower; and
(VI) Wind.
(2) Does not include coal, natural gas, oil, propane or any
other fossil fuel, or nuclear energy.
(j) “Triboelectric device” means a device that converts energy
from ambient vibrations into electricity.
Sec. 34. Section 69 of chapter 2, Statutes of Nevada 2015,
29th Special Session, at page 54, is hereby amended to read as
follows:
Sec. 69. 1. This section and sections 1 to 32,
inclusive, 33.5, 34 to 45, inclusive, and 46 to 68, inclusive, of
this act become effective upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 1 to 18, inclusive, of this act expire by
limitation on June 30, [2032.] 2033.
3. The amendatory provisions of sections 30, 31, 34, 41
to 44, inclusive, 46 and 63 of this act expire by limitation on
June 30, [2032.] 2033.
4. Sections 33 and 45.5 of this act become effective on
July 1, [2032.] 2033.
Sec. 35. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 36. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 37. The Legislature hereby finds that each abatement or
deduction provided by this act from any ad valorem tax on property
-
*SB461*

– 54 –
or excise tax on the sale, storage, use or other consumption of
tangible personal property sold at retail:
1. Will achieve a bona fide social or economic purpose and the
benefits of the abatement or deduction are expected to exceed any
adverse effect of the abatement or deduction on the provision of
services to the public by the State or a local government that would
otherwise receive revenue from the tax from which the abatement or
deduction would be granted; and
2. Will not impair adversely the ability of the State or a local
government to pay, when due, all interest and principal on any
outstanding bonds or any other obligations for which revenue from
the tax from which the abatement or deduction would be granted
was pledged.
Sec. 38. NRS 231.1468 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 39. 1. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
2. Sections 3, 13, 14, 15 and 33 of this act expire by limitation
on June 30, 2045.
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTION
231.1468 Required contents of workforce diversity action
plan. A workforce diversity action plan submitted to the Office
for approval pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 3 of NRS
231.1467 or paragraph (e) of subsection 9 of NRS 231.1467 must
include, without limitation:
1. A statement expressing a commitment to workforce
diversity, an explanation of the actions that will be taken and
strategies that will be implemented to promote workforce diversity
and the goals and performance measures which will be used to
measure the success of the plan in achieving those goals; and
2. A statement expressing a commitment to comply with all
applicable federal and state laws.
H
-
*SB461*